Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska28-113
Civil action authorized; statute of limitations; proof required.

(1) A person against whom a violation of section 28-111 has been committed may bring a civil action for equitable relief, general and special damages, reasonable attorney's fees, and costs.

(2) A civil action brought pursuant to this section must be brought within four years after the date of the violation of section 28-111.

(3) In a civil action brought pursuant to this section, the plaintiff shall establish by a preponderance of the evidence that the defendant committed the criminal offense against the plaintiff or the plaintiff's property because of the plaintiff's race, color, religion, ancestry, national origin, gender, sexual orientation, age, or disability or because of the plaintiff's association with a person of a certain race, color, religion, ancestry, national origin, gender, sexual orientation, age, or disability.

Laws 1997, LB 90, § 5.